Wyoming, session 2025, SF0059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-28-108(c) is amended to read:

17-28-108. Production of records.

(c) The secretary of state shall hold any records
obtained pursuant to this section confidential except for
information already on file with the secretary of state as
part of a public document and information required to be in
SF0059

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0205
the annual report required by W.S. 17-16-1630(a). The
secretary of state may release any such confidential
information only pursuant to court ordered subpoena, or to
a bona fide law enforcement agency for use in a criminal
investigation or, upon written application, to a county
assessor or county treasurer to obtain the information for
official business. Any records obtained by a county
assessor or county treasurer pursuant to this subsection
shall be held confidential, provided that the county
assessor or county treasurer may release such confidential
information only pursuant to a court ordered subpoena or to
a bona fide law enforcement agency for use in a criminal
investigation.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0059